Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1154
Legislative purpose and findings.

The purpose of sections 25-1154 to 25-1157 is to provide an alternate dispute resolution technique, to be known as the summary jury trial, for use by the parties to civil court actions. The Legislature finds that the procedures set forth in such sections will save valuable court and juror resources, promote prompt resolution of disputes, and increase settlement of disputed actions prior to a jury trial. The Legislature declares that courts should liberally construe such sections and employ summary jury trials in appropriate civil actions to effectuate the purposes and findings set forth in this section.

Laws 1987, LB 225, § 1.